Hawaii statutes.
§341-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Center" means the University
of Hawaii environmental center established in section [304A-1551].

"Council" means the environmental
council established in section 341-3(c).

"Director" means the director of
environmental quality control.

"Office" means the office of
environmental quality control established in section 341-3(a).

"University" means the University of
Hawaii. [L 1970, c 132, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 75, §12]

Revision Note

In definition of "center", "environmental
center" substituted for "ecology or environmental center".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next